Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10E-122] Scope; effective dates.
This part shall apply to all homeowners insurance policies delivered or issued
for delivery in this State after July 31, 2012. [L 2012, c 80, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next